Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-2,114
Proposed instream appropriation; additional studies; notice of application.

Prior to taking action on an application for an instream appropriation, the Chief Water Officer shall conduct any studies he or she deems necessary to evaluate the application and shall publish notice of such application at the applicant's expense at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the stream segment and also in a newspaper of statewide circulation. The notice shall state that any person having an interest may in writing object to and request a hearing on the application. Any such objection and request for hearing shall be filed with the Chief Water Officer within two weeks of final publication of the notice.

Laws 1984, LB 1106, § 30;

Laws 1985, LB 102, § 16;

Laws 1987, LB 140, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 278, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 146;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 129.